Utah statutes.
58-44a-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  Each license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.

(b)  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall:

(a)  hold a valid certification from the American College of Nurse Midwives Certification Council, Inc.; and

(b)  have met continuing competency requirements defined by the division rule in collaboration with the board.



Amended by Chapter 268, 2001 General Session

